Utah statutes.
70A-7a-204.   Duty of care -- Contractual limitation of warehouse's
liability.
(1)  A warehouse is liable for damages for loss of or injury to the goods
caused by its failure to exercise care with regard to the goods that a
reasonably careful person would exercise under similar circumstances.  Unless
otherwise agreed, the warehouse is not liable for damages that could not have
been avoided by the exercise of that care.
(2)  Damages may be limited by a term in the warehouse receipt or storage
agreement limiting the amount of liability in case of loss or damage beyond
which the warehouse is not liable.  Such a limitation is not effective with
respect to the warehouse's liability for conversion to its own use.  On
request of the bailor in a record at the time of signing the storage agreement
or within a reasonable time after receipt of the warehouse receipt, the
warehouse's liability may be increased on part or all of the goods covered by
the storage agreement or the warehouse receipt.  In this event, increased
rates may be charged based on an increased valuation of the goods.
(3)  Reasonable provisions as to the time and manner of presenting claims and
commencing actions based on the bailment may be included in the warehouse
receipt or storage agreement.
